apertium-wad.wad.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for wad

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>   ! Noun
%<adj%> ! Adjective
%<ess%> ! ve
%<dem%>
%<det%>
%<imp%>
%<ij%>
%<itg%>
%<loc%>
%<v%>
%<num%>
%<prt%>
%<pr%>
%<prn%>
%<np%>
%<adj%>
%<adp%>
%<adv%>
%<comp%>
%<cnj%>
%<det%>
%<def%>
%<prx%>
%<mid%>
%<dist%>
%<prt%> ! particle
%<top%> ! topic
%<dir%> ! directional
%<asp%> ! aspect marker
%<ints%> ! intensifier
%<neg%> ! negative
%<dur%> ! durative
%<cnj%> ! conjunction
%<appl%> ! applicative
%<caus%> ! causative
%<hum%> ! human
%<nh%>  ! non-human
%<p1%>
%<p2%>
%<p3%>
%<o3sg%>

! Number morphology
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary
%{b%}
%{B%}
%{D%}
%{A%}

%[%+1incdu%] %[%+1incpl%] %[%+1sg%] %[%+1excdu%] %[%+1excpl%] %[%+2sg%] %[%+2du%] %[%+2pl%] %[%+3sg%] %[%+3du%] %[%+3plhum%] %[%+3plnh%]

%[%-1incdu%] %[%-1incpl%] %[%-1sg%] %[%-1excdu%] %[%-1excpl%] %[%-2sg%] %[%-2du%] %[%-2pl%] %[%-3sg%] %[%-3du%] %[%-3plhum%] %[%-3plnh%]

%[%+appl%] %[%-appl%]
%[%+caus%] %[%-caus%]

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Adjective ;
AdpositionRoot ;
AdverbRoot ;
ComplementizerRoot ;
ConjunctionRoot ;
DemonstrativeRoot ;
Determiner ;
ImperativeRoot ;
InterjectionRoot ;
InterrogativeRoot ;
LocativeRoot ;
NounRoot ;
NumeralRoot ;
ParticleRoot ;
PrepositionRoot ;
PronounRoot ;
ProperNounRoot ;
VerbPrefix ;
! blah?Root
Clitics ;
Punctuation ;

LEXICON Adjective

AdjectiveRoot ;
ve%<ess%>:ve%> AdjectiveRoot ;

LEXICON VerbPrefix

%[%+1incdu%]:tur%> VerbApplicative ;
%[%+1incpl%]:tat%> VerbApplicative ;
%[%+1sg%]:i%> VerbApplicative ;
%[%+1excdu%]:amur%> VerbApplicative ;
%[%+1excpl%]:amat%> VerbApplicative ;
%[%+2sg%]:%{B%}u%> VerbApplicative ;
%[%+2du%]:mur%> VerbApplicative ;
%[%+2pl%]:met%> VerbApplicative ;
%[%+3sg%]:%{D%}i%> VerbApplicative ;
%[%+3du%]:sur%> VerbApplicative ;
%[%+3plhum%]:set%> VerbApplicative ;
%[%+3plnh%]:si%> VerbApplicative ;

LEXICON VerbApplicative

%[%+appl%]:it%> VerbCausative ;
VerbCausative ;

LEXICON VerbCausative

%[%+caus%]:on%> VerbRoot ;
VerbRoot ;

LEXICON VerbInfl

%<v%>%<p1%>%<du%>%<incl%>%[%-1incdu%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<incl%>%[%-1incpl%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%[%-1sg%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p1%>%<du%>%<excl%>%[%-1excdu%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<excl%>%[%-1excpl%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%[%-2sg%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p2%>%<du%>%[%-2du%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%[%-2pl%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%[%-3sg%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p3%>%<du%>%[%-3du%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<hum%>%[%-3plhum%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nh%>%[%-3plnh%]: VerbInflAppl ;

LEXICON VerbInflAppl

%<appl%>%[%-appl%]: VerbInflCaus ;
VerbInflCaus ;

LEXICON VerbInflCaus

%<caus%>%[%-caus%]: VerbObj ;
VerbObj ;

LEXICON VerbObj

%<o3sg%>:i # ;
%<o3pl%>:si # ;
# ;

LEXICON AdjectiveInfl
%<adj%>: # ;

LEXICON AdpositionInfl
%<adp%>: # ;

LEXICON AdverbInfl
%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON ComplementizerInfl
%<comp%>: # ;

LEXICON ConjunctionInfl
%<cnj%>: # ;

LEXICON Determiner
ne%<det%>%<def%>%<prx%>:ne DeterminerNumber ;
pa%<det%>%<def%>%<mid%>:pa DeterminerNumber ;
wa%<det%>%<def%>%<dist%>:wa DeterminerNumber ;
pe%<def%>%<ind%>:pe DeterminerNumber ;

LEXICON DeterminerNumber
# ;
%<sg%>:i # ;
%<pl%>%<nh%>:si # ;
%<pl%>%<hum%>:sia # ;

LEXICON DemonstrativeRoot
nini:nini DemonstrativeInfl ; ! eng: "this" ind: "ini"


!LEXICON DeterminerRoot
!ne:ne DeterminerInfl ; ! eng: "the" ind: "itu"
!pa:pa DeterminerInfl ; ! eng: "the" ind: "itu"
!pesi:pesi DeterminerInfl ; ! eng: "plural indefinite determiner; some" ind: "suatu"

LEXICON DemonstrativeInfl
%<dem%>: # ;

!LEXICON DeterminerInfl
!%<det%>: # ;

LEXICON ImperativeInfl
%<imp%>: # ;

LEXICON InterjectionInfl
%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON InterrogativeInfl
%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON LocativeInfl
%<loc%>: # ;

LEXICON NounInfl
%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON NumeralInfl
%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON ParticleInfl
%<prt%>: # ;

LEXICON PrepositionInfl
%<pr%>: # ;

LEXICON PronounInfl
%<prn%>: # ;

LEXICON ProperNounInfl
%<np%>: # ;

! LEXICON blah?Infl


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON AdpositionRoot
rawave:rawave AdpositionInfl ; ! eng: "downwards; farther down" ind: "ke bawah (lagi)"
susa:susa AdpositionInfl ; ! eng: "inside" ind: "dalam"


LEXICON AdverbRoot
ariri:ariri AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "like that ; like so" ind: "seperti itu ; begitu sudah"
awori:awori AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "then" ind: "lalu"
aya:aya AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "not yet" ind: "belum"
diadi% va:diadi% va AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "very" ind: "sekali"
diuwa:diuwa AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "downwards, to below" ind: "ke bawah"
dorewa:dorewa AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "shorewards" ind: "ke darat"
doriwa:doriwa AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "towards outside" ind: "ke luar"
katuerine:katuerine AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "progressive aspect ; just now" ind: "sedang ; tadi"
kausapa:kausapa AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "tomorrow; morning" ind: "besok; pagi"
kavori:kavori AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "just now ; now; later; non-past" ind: "baru ; sekarang; nanti"
kota:kota AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "also ; too" ind: "juga"
ma:ma AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "hither ; to here" ind: "ke sini"
mesu:mesu AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "downwards" ind: "ke bawah"
moyar:moyar AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "don't; may not ; can't" ind: "jangan; tidak boleh"
nanaria:nanaria AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "slowly" ind: "pelan"
nani:nani AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "later" ind: "nanti"
okatuma:okatuma AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "shortly; momentarily" ind: "sebentar"
pana:pana AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "beginning to" ind: "sedang, mulai, langsung"
papo:papo AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "earlier ; an earlier time ; front" ind: "dulu ; depan"
ra:ra AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "thence" ind: "ke sana"
raria% nini:raria% nini AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "today" ind: "hari ini"
raria% pesi:raria% pesi AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "someday; one day" ind: "satu saat"
rava:rava AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "to below ; down ; to there" ind: "ke bawah"
ravinie% wana:ravinie% wana AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "yesterday" ind: "kemarin"
rawai:rawai AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "more than" ind: "lebih"
rusara:rusara AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "repeatedly" ind: "ulang kali"
saira:saira AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "quickly; fast" ind: "cepat"
sara:sara AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "left (side)" ind: "kiri"
sasari:sasari AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "tomorrow" ind: "besok"
sisande:sisande AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "along the shoreline" ind: "sepanjang garis pantai"
tape:tape AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "thusly" ind: "begitu"
tapena:tapena AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "thus already" ind: "begitu sudah"
tayana:tayana AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "already thus" ind: "itu sudah"
tomanau:tomanau AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "already" ind: "sudah"
toro:toro AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "very ; a lot" ind: "sekali"
varami:varami AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "not yet; never yet" ind: "belum pernah"
varare:varare AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "beside a house" ind: "di samping rumah"
vata:vata AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "right (side)" ind: "kanan"
venasia:venasia AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "only; just" ind: "saja"
vesiri:vesiri AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "very" ind: "sekali"
vesisiai:vesisiai AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "rarely" ind: "jarang"
viove:viove AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "in(to) pieces" ind: "bagi-bagi"
vo:vo AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "intensifier" ind: "sekali"
woroi:woroi AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "long (time)" ind: "lama"
ya:ya AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "again" ind: "lagi"
yanama:yanama AdverbInfl ; ! eng: "then" ind: "terus; lalu"

LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
asisi:asisi AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "silent" ind: "diam"
batoyar:batoyar AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "thick" ind: "tebal"
kake:kake AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "green; blue" ind: "hijau; biru"
kawawaru:kawawaru AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "lazy" ind: "pamalas"
kotar:kotar AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "fit, narrow, tight" ind: "pas, sesak, sempit"
mamara:mamara AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "clean ; clear ; white" ind: "bersih ; jernih ; putih"
marai:marai AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "ripe" ind: "masak; matang"
mariat:mariat AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "gentle" ind: "lembut"
mas:mas AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "hot" ind: "panas"
masasabu:masasabu AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "smashed; shattered" ind: "pecah-pecah ; hancur-hancur"
masise:masise AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "like" ind: "seperti"
mirarebis:mirarebis AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "slippery" ind: "licin"
nganggau:ŋaŋgau AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "confused" ind: "bingung"
paname:paname AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "very fine" ind: "halus sekali"
piat:piat AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "raw" ind: "mentah"
pumat:pumat AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "dull" ind: "tumpul"
saire:saire AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "smell; putrid" ind: "bauh; busuk"
sava:sava AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "cheap" ind: "murah"
tapisa:tapisa AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "light" ind: "ringan"
urar:urar AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "red" ind: "merah"
vebasa:vebasa AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "wet" ind: "basah"
voru:voru AdjectiveInfl ; ! eng: "die; dead" ind: "mati ; meninggal"
LEXICON NounRoot
ai% kiai% dir:ai% kiai% dir NounInfl ; ! eng: "toenail" ind: "kuku kaki"
ai% tupapui:ai% tupapui NounInfl ; ! eng: "heel" ind: "tumit"
ana% su:ana% su NounInfl ; ! eng: "basket for holding sago" ind: "tempat/ember untuk letakkan sagu"
andori% pimasa:andori% pimasa NounInfl ; ! eng: "k.o. guava" ind: "jambu bola"
aro:aro NounInfl ; ! eng: "chest" ind: "dada"
bata:bata NounInfl ; ! eng: "large wave" ind: "ombak besar"
dodeso:dodeso NounInfl ; ! eng: "ambush, trap" ind: "penyerangan"
kamari:kamari NounInfl ; ! eng: "basement" ind: "kolong rumah"
karusina:karusina NounInfl ; ! eng: "backbone; spine" ind: "tulang belakang"
kokori:kokori NounInfl ; ! eng: "chicken" ind: "ayam"
mani:mani NounInfl ; ! eng: "oil" ind: "minyak"
muna:muna NounInfl ; ! eng: "rain" ind: "hujan"
pensil:pensil NounInfl ; ! eng: "k.o. sea cucumber" ind: "sejenis teripang"
ran(u):ran(u) NounInfl ; ! eng: "song" ind: "lagu"
rebuosina:rebuosina NounInfl ; ! eng: "forehead" ind: "dahi"
sama% kai:sama% kai NounInfl ; ! eng: "tail" ind: "ekor"
sasu:sasu NounInfl ; ! eng: "clothes" ind: "baju ; pakaian"
since:since NounInfl ; ! eng: "girl" ind: "anak perempuan"
suora% sasu:suora% sasu NounInfl ; ! eng: "sarong" ind: "sarong baju"
toko:toko NounInfl ; ! eng: "store" ind: "toko"
vavo:vavo NounInfl ; ! eng: "top; above" ind: "di atas"
wara% tu:wara% tu NounInfl ; ! eng: "body hair" ind: "bulu badan"
LEXICON VerbRoot
ania:%{A%}nia VerbInfl ; ! eng: "crawl ; walk slowly" ind: "merayap ; jalan pelahan"
ara:%{A%}ra VerbInfl ; ! eng: "stay up; stay awake" ind: "tahan mata"
avi:%{A%}vi VerbInfl ; ! eng: "give birth to; be parent to" ind: "melahirkan"
bajor:b%{A%}jor VerbInfl ; ! eng: "hide" ind: "sembunyi; pele"
isi:isi VerbInfl ; ! eng: "to wind, as papeda on chopsticks" ind: "balik (papeda)"
kanisu:k%{A%}nisu VerbInfl ; ! eng: "saliva; to spit" ind: "ludah; meludah"
karutarera:k%{A%}rutarera VerbInfl ; ! eng: "turn one's back on" ind: "membelakangi"
ke% sasi:ke% sasi VerbInfl ; ! eng: "defecate" ind: "buang air besar"
kubira:kubira VerbInfl ; ! eng: "bathe" ind: "mandi"
mararieti:m%{A%}rarieti VerbInfl ; ! eng: "charred" ind: "hangus sekali"
masubat:m%{A%}subat VerbInfl ; ! eng: "muddy" ind: "tanah lumpur"
naya:n%{A%}ya VerbInfl ; ! eng: "curse" ind: "maki"
pape:p%{A%}pe VerbInfl ; ! eng: "wash (clothes)" ind: "cuci (baju)"
rama:r%{A%}ma VerbInfl ; ! eng: "come" ind: "datang"
rora:rora VerbInfl ; ! eng: "hit" ind: "pukul"
sai(s):s%{A%}i(s) VerbInfl ; ! eng: "cry" ind: "menangis"
sasera:s%{A%}sera VerbInfl ; ! eng: "look for ; seek" ind: "cari"
so:so VerbInfl ; ! eng: "throw" ind: "lempar"
sume:sume VerbInfl ; ! eng: "smoke; suck" ind: "merokok; isap"
tavavu:t%{A%}vavu VerbInfl ; ! eng: "cover" ind: "tutup"
tupar:tupar VerbInfl ; ! eng: "appear" ind: "muncul"
vata:v%{A%}ta VerbInfl ; ! eng: "lie down" ind: "merebahkan diri, baring"
vo:vo VerbInfl ; ! eng: "paddle" ind: "dayung"
